Nebraska, session 109, LB1261A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $4,750 from the Nebraska Power
Review Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $4,750 from the Nebraska Power Review Fund
for FY2027-28 to the Nebraska Power Review Board, for Program 72, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1261, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-